Utah statutes.
17-28-13.   Appeal to district court.
(1)  Any person aggrieved by a determination of the County Fire Civil Service
Council may, within 30 days after notice of the council's ruling, institute an
action in the district court of the county or in the county of the aggrieved
person's residence, against the County Fire Civil Service Council in its
official capacity, setting out his grievance and his right to complain.  In
its answer, the council may set out any matter in justification.
(2)  The court shall determine the issues of both questions of law and fact
and may affirm, set aside, or modify the council ruling.
